Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-155
Use of terms, prohibited; exception.

Except as otherwise provided in this section,
no person, partnership, or limited liability company shall assume
or use the title or designation certified accountant, public accountant, chartered accountant, enrolled
accountant, licensed accountant, or registered accountant or any other title
or designation likely to be confused with certified public accountant or any
of the abbreviations C.A., P.A., E.A., R.A., or L.A. or similar abbreviations
likely to be confused with C.P.A. No
person shall assume or use the title or designation enrolled agent or E.A.
except a person so designated by the Internal Revenue Service. Any
person who holds a permit issued under section 1-136 which is not revoked
or suspended and all of whose offices in this state for the practice of public
accountancy are maintained and registered as required under section 1-135
may hold himself or herself out to the public as an accountant or auditor.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 50, p. 73;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 53;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 45;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 27.